Washington statutes.
RCW 17.21.320

Access to public or private premises—Search warrants—Prosecuting attorney's duties—Injunctions.

(1) For purpose of carrying out the provisions of this chapter the director may enter upon any public or private premises at reasonable times, in order:

(a) To have access for the purpose of inspecting any equipment subject to this chapter and such premises on which such equipment is kept or stored;

(b) To inspect lands actually or reported to be exposed to pesticides;

(c) To inspect storage or disposal areas;

(d) To inspect or investigate complaints of injury to humans or land; or

(e) To sample pesticides being applied or to be applied.

(2) Should the director be denied access to any land where such access was sought for the purposes set forth in this chapter, the director may apply to any court of competent jurisdiction for a search warrant authorizing access to such land for said purposes. The court may upon such application, issue the search warrant for the purposes requested.

(3) It shall be the duty of each prosecuting attorney to whom any violation of this chapter is reported, to cause appropriate proceedings to be instituted and prosecuted in a court of competent jurisdiction without delay.

(4) The director may bring an action to enjoin the violation or threatened violation of any provision of this chapter or any rule made pursuant to this chapter in the superior court of the county in which such violation occurs or is about to occur.

[ 1989 c 380 s 62; 1971 ex.s. c 191 s 10.]